bng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" ?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>  <alphabet>aAiIuUqeEoOkKgGMcCjJtTdTNwWxXnFpPbBmyrlbSRsh</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
			<sdef n="n"/> 			<!-- noun -->
			<sdef n="sg"/>			<!-- singular -->
			<sdef n="pl"/>			<!-- plural -->
			<sdef n="anim"/>		<!-- animate -->
			<sdef n="inanim"/>		<!-- inanimate -->
			<sdef n="m"/>			<!-- male -->
			<sdef n="f"/>			<!-- female -->
			<sdef n="ke"/>			<!-- dvitIyA -->
			<sdef n="ra"/>			<!-- genitive -->
			<sdef n="era"/>			<!-- genitive -->
			<sdef n="xera"/>		<!-- plural -->
			<sdef n="e"/>			<!-- saptamI -->
			<sdef n="we"/>			<!-- saptamI -->
			<sdef n="ya"/>			<!-- saptamI -->
			<sdef n="np"/> 			<!-- proper nouns -->
			<sdef n="enc"/> 		<!-- enclitics -->
			<sdef n="emph"/> 		<!-- emphatic -->
			<sdef n="paryanwa"/> 		<!-- enclitics -->
  	</sdefs>
		<pardef n="aBimAn/a_n">
			<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>era</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erao</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>akei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAke</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkeo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAi</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="aparAX/a_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>era</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erao</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAke</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkeo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aguli</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>agulira</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ati</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAi</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>agulo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="hAsapAwAl/a_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="e"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAwe</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAwei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAweo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAra</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atArai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atArao</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aguli</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>agulo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aguloke</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>agulowe</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>agulowei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aguloweo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aparyanwa</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="paryanwa"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ewe</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>era</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erao</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="cil/a_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>arA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>exera</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>era</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAra</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atArai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atArao</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAke</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>atAkeo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="aXyApak/a_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="e"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>axera</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="xera"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ajana</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>asakala</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>arA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>erA</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ke"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>akei</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>akeo</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>era</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="aXyApikA_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>kei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>keo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ya</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ya"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>rA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>sakala</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerake</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="gAmaCA_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guli</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guli</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulira</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ya</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ya"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAya</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ya"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guliwe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulowe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>	
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="kAkA_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>kei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>keo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAkei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAkeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tikeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>rA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>sakala</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerake</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakei</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xerakeo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="ke"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
	
		</pardef>
